South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S70.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 19, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 5 School Board Member Code of Ethics Section 59-19-710. The purpose of this article is to enhance local school governance by promoting the highest standards of ethical behavior. Section 59-19-720. For the purposes of this article, "board member" means a person holding membership, whether by election or appointment, on a board of education, including a charter school board, charter school authorizer board, or the South Carolina Charter School District Board, other than the State Board of Education. Section 59-19-730. (A) The State Board of Education shall adopt, and revise as necessary, a model code of ethics consistent with standards established by the South Carolina Ethics Commission for local school board members. (B)(1) A local school board shall adopt a local code of ethics applicable to that board within three months after adoption of the model code of ethics by the State Board of Education. A local code must include, at a minimum, the State Board of Education's model code of ethics. (2) If the State Board of Education adopts a revision to the model code of ethics, then local school boards shall adopt and incorporate the revision into their local code within three months of the adoption of the revision by the State Board of Education. (3) A local school board may only adopt its local code of ethics or any changes to that local code at a regularly scheduled meeting. (4) A local school board may not adopt or follow a code of ethics that prevents its members from freely discussing the policies and actions of the board outside of a board meeting except for matters discussed in executive session. This does not preclude a local school board from adopting a policy in a regularly scheduled meeting that prohibits certain disclosures allowed by law. (5) A local school board shall submit a copy of its local code of ethics and subsequent revisions to the State Board of Education within sixty days of adoption. (6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to repeal, replace, or preclude application of any other statute. SECTION 2.  Section 59-19-45 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-19-45.  (A) The department shall: (1) adopt a required training program for new local school board members delivered by the department or the department's designee(s). (2) adopt a required training program for local school board members that have been re-elected or reappointed delivered by the department or the department's designee(s). (3) review the training program and adopt any necessary revisions every three years.  The department may designate a designee(s) for this review process.  Every three years, the department or the department's designee(s) shall review the training program and adopt any necessary revisions. (B) Within one yearnine months of taking office, all persons elected, reelected, or appointed, or reappointed as members of a school district board of trustees after July 1, 1997 regardless of the date of their election, reelection, appointment, or reappointment, shall complete successfully the required an orientationtraining program in the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a board member including, but not limited to, topics on policy development, personnel, superintendent and board relations, instructional programs, district finance, school law, ethics, nepotism, conflicts of interest, and community relations. This program must be offered by the department or its designee(s) and completed by each board member within nine months after his election, reelection, appointment, or reappointment. The State Board of Education must keep a record of the school board trustees who complete the training program within the required time.  The State Board of Education shall issue a letter of caution informing any school board trustee who fails to comply with the requirements of this section providing a time in which to cure the noncompliance.  If the school board trustee fails to cure his noncompliance, the State Board of Education shall submit the name of the school board trustee to the Governor for recommendation of removal under Section 59-19-60. (C)(B) The orientation shall be approved by the State Board of Education and conducted by public or private entities approved by the State Board of Education such as the South Carolina School Boards Association.In addition to meeting other requirements provided by law, a person serving on a local school board shall sign a statement certifying that he understands and is in compliance with the South Carolina ethics law, the applicable local code of ethics, and the training required pursuant to this section. (D)(C) The provisions of this section also apply to members of county boards of education appointed or elected after July 1, 1997, in the same manner the provisions of this section apply to members of school district boards of trustees.A local school board shall certify compliance with the provisions of subsection (B) and (C) by all board members within nine months of the election, reelection, appointment, or reappointment of the board and publish this certification in the minutes of the next regularly scheduled school board meeting. (D) The provisions of this section do not apply to a school board trustee or county board of education member who was serving in such office on July 1, 1997, and who is continuously reelected or reappointed to office thereafter. (E) The State Department of Education shall reimburse a school district or county board of education conducting an orientation for a new board member as required by this section at the rate of eighty dollars for a member, provided that the total reimbursements by the department in one fiscal year must not exceed ten thousand dollars.  If the total projected cost of these reimbursements for a year as determined by the department exceeds ten thousand dollars, the eighty-dollar reimbursement for each new member must be reduced proportionately.  If funds are not available for these reimbursements, the board member orientation is not required but may be conducted at the option of a school district or county board of education. The State Board of Education shall establish guidelines and procedures for these reimbursements. (F) The State Department of Education must keep a record of the school board trustees who complete the orientation program. SECTION 3.  Section 59-19-730(A) and Section 59-19-45(A)(1) takes effect upon approval by the Governor but must be completed by December 31, 2026. The training program pursuant to Section 59-19-45(B) must be offered by the department or its designee(s) and completed by each board member within one year after the effective date of this act. ----XX----